Arkansas, session 2025, SB560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-10-704(c), concerning contribution rates
of each employer, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The director shall determine the contribution rates of each
employer according to the requirements of this section and § 11-10-705.
(2)(A) For any calendar year beginning on or after January 1,
2024, each employer's rate shall be one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) except
as otherwise provided in this subchapter.
(B)(i)(a) An employer's rate shall not be less than one
and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) unless and until there have been three (3)
years immediately preceding the computation date throughout which an
individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits, if
*ANS355*
04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB560
eligible.
(b) Provided, however, an employer who, at the
time of establishing an account, is in business in another state or states
and who is not currently doing business in Arkansas may elect to receive a
beginning contribution rate of one and nine-tenths percent (1.9%) or a
contribution rate based on the rate schedule in § 11-10-705(b)(1), whichever
is lower, but in no event less than one percent (1%), provided:
(1) The employer has been in operation
in the other state or states for at least three (3) years immediately
preceding the date of becoming a liable employer in Arkansas, throughout
which an individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits, if
eligible;
(2) The employer must provide the
authenticated account history from information accumulated from operations in
the other state or states to compute a current Arkansas rate; and
(3) The employer's business operations
established in Arkansas are of the same nature as conducted in the other
state or states, as defined by the North American Industry Classification
System.
(ii)(a) The election authorized in subdivision
(c)(2)(B)(i) of this section must be made in writing within thirty (30) days
after receiving notice of Arkansas liability.
(b) A one-and-nine-tenths-percent rate
will be assigned unless a timely election has been made.
(iii)(a) If the election is timely made, the
employer's account will receive the rate elected for the remainder of that
rate year.
(b) The rate assigned for the next and
subsequent years will be determined by the condition of the account on the
computation date.
(C) However, any employer having no covered employment
under this chapter for any calendar year shall have a rate equal to his or
her most recently determined contribution rate until the employer has one (1)
full year of benefit risk experience immediately preceding the computation
date.
(3)(A) For any calendar year beginning on or after January 1,
04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB560
2026, each employer's rate shall be one and eighth-tenths percent (1.8%)
except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.
(B)(i)(a) An employer's rate shall not be less than one
and eighth-tenths percent (1.8%) unless and until there have been three (3)
years immediately preceding the computation date throughout which an
individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits, if
eligible.
(b) Provided, however, an employer who, at the
time of establishing an account, is in business in another state or states
and who is not currently doing business in Arkansas may elect to receive a
beginning contribution rate of one and eighth-tenths percent (1.8%) or a
contribution rate based on the rate schedule in § 11-10-705(b)(1), whichever
is lower, but in no event less than one percent (1%), provided:
(1) The employer has been in operation
in the other state or states for at least three (3) years immediately
preceding the date of becoming a liable employer in Arkansas, throughout
which an individual in the employer's employ could have received benefits, if
eligible;
(2) The employer must provide the
authenticated account history from information accumulated from operations in
the other state or states to compute a current Arkansas rate; and
(3) The employer's business operations
established in Arkansas are of the same nature as conducted in the other
state or states, as defined by the North American Industry Classification
System.
(ii)(a) The election authorized in subdivision
(c)(3)(B)(i) of this section must be made in writing within thirty (30) days
after receiving notice of Arkansas liability.
(b) A one-and-eighth-tenths-percent (1.8%)
rate will be assigned unless a timely election has been made.
(iii)(a) If the election is timely made, the
employer's account will receive the rate elected for the remainder of that
rate year.
(b) The rate assigned for the next and
subsequent years will be determined by the condition of the account on the
computation date.
04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB560
(C) However, an employer having no covered employment
under this chapter for any calendar year shall have a rate equal to his or
her most recently determined contribution rate until the employer has one (1)
full year of benefit risk experience immediately preceding the computation
date.
(4)(A) Notwithstanding any other provisions of §§ 11-10-701 —
11-10-715, if the director determines that an employer has willfully
submitted false information that is material with respect to the employment
or separation from employment of any claimant, employee, or former employee,
for the purpose of preventing regular benefit charges to the employer's
account, the employer shall be assessed a penalty equivalent to twice the
amount of the claimant's maximum potential benefit amount.
(B) This penalty shall be charged against the employer's
account for experience rating purposes, regardless of whether or not the
employer is a base-period employer and irrespective of the identity or number
of the base-period employer.
(4)(5) An employer who changes from reimbursement to the
contributory method of financing shall be considered a new or newly covered
employer and can be entitled to an experience rate only when the new or newly
covered employer has met the requirements of this subsection.
(5)(6) Each employer's rate beginning January 1 for each twelve-
month period shall be determined on the basis of the employer's record
through June 30 of the previous calendar year.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-10-705(b)(1)(B), concerning the reserve
ratio schedule table under the Workers' Compensation Law, is amended to read
as follows:
(B) The reserve ratio in the following schedule is
determined by dividing the difference in contributions paid and regular
benefits charged by the annual taxable payroll:
CONTRIBUTION RESERVE RATIO
RATE
0.1%(0.0%) 9.95% or more
0.3%(0.2%) 9.35% but less than 9.95%
0.5%(0.4%) 8.85% but less than 9.35%
0.8%(0.7%) 8.65% but less than 8.85%
04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB560
1.2%(1.1%) 8.35% but less than 8.65%
1.6%(1.5%) 7.95% but less than 8.35%
2.0%(1.9%) 7.35% but less than 7.95%
2.4%(2.3%) 6.75% but less than 7.35%
2.8%(2.7%) 5.45% but less than 6.75%
3.2%(3.1%) 2.45% but less than 5.45%
4.0%(3.9%) 1.35% but less than 2.45%
5.0%(4.9%) Less than 1.35% with a positive
reserve balance
6.0%(5.9%) Less than 0.00%

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 11-10-706 is amended to read as follows:
11-10-706. Future rates — Administrative assessment.
(a)(1) Effective July 1, 2023, each employer shall be required to pay
an administrative assessment on wages paid by the employer with respect to
employment.
(2) This administrative assessment shall not be credited to the
separate account of each employer.
(b)(1) For the period July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, the
administrative assessment shall be twelve and one-half hundredths of one
percent (0.125%).
(2) For the period beginning on and after July 1, 2024, the
administrative assessment shall be one-tenth of one percent (0.1%).
(3) For the period beginning on and after January 1, 2026, the
administrative assessment shall be two-tenths of one percent (0.2%).
(c)(1) Each fiscal year, sixty percent (60%) of the proceeds of the
administrative assessment, up to six million dollars ($6,000,000), shall be
deposited and credited to the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment
Insurance Administration Fund, there to be used for personal services and
operating expenses of the unemployment insurance program necessary for the
proper administration of the Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101
et seq., as determined by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.
(2)(A) After collection of the proceeds of the administrative
assessment specified in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, only for the
period from July 1, 2023, through June 30, 2024, the remaining proceeds, if
any, of the administrative assessment shall be deposited and credited to the
04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB560
Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund,
there to be used solely for the purpose of modernizing information technology
systems and hardware utilized in the administration of the unemployment
insurance program.
(B) The maximum amount to be deposited and credited under
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall not exceed the difference between
thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) and the amounts deposited and
credited in previous state fiscal years to the Division of Workforce Services
Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund for the purpose of modernizing
information technology systems and hardware utilized in the administration of
the unemployment insurance program.
(3)(2) Each fiscal year, after collection of the proceeds of the
administrative assessment specified in subdivisions (c)(1) and (2)
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the remaining proceeds, if any, of the
administrative assessment in an amount up to two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) shall be deposited and credited to the Division
of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund, there to be used for personal
services, operating expenses, construction, grants, and worker training.
(4) Each fiscal year, after collection of the proceeds of the
administrative assessment specified under subdivisions (c)(1)-(3) of this
section, the remaining proceeds, if any, of the administrative assessment
shall be deposited and credited to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
(5)(3) The director shall report to the Legislative Council on a
quarterly basis as to any uses of the Division of Workforce Services Training
Trust Fund and the Division of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance
Administration Fund.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1131(b)(2), concerning the uses of the
Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) The fund shall be used for personal services, operating
expenses, construction, grants, and worker training under rules promulgated
by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

/s/J. English

04-01-2025 12:40:00 ANS355